Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Disposal of Waste Tires and Lead Acid Batteries; Right-Way-To-Throw-Away Program

§ 17-17-401.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

Uncontrolled disposal of waste tires may create a public health and safety problem because tire piles act as breeding sites for mosquitoes and other disease-transmitting vectors, pose substantial fire hazards and present a difficult disposal problem for landfills.

A significant number of waste tires are illegally dumped in Mississippi.

It is in the state’s best interest to encourage efforts to recycle or recover resources from waste tires.

It is desirable to discourage the landfilling of whole waste tires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-403.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Commission” means the Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Collection contractor” means a person approved by the department and used by a county, municipality or multicounty agency to operate a household hazardous waste collection and management program.

“Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Household hazardous waste” means any waste that would be considered hazardous under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974, Section 17-17-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, or any rules and regulations promulgated thereto, but for the fact that it is produced in quantities smaller than those regulated under that law or regulations and is generated by persons not otherwise covered by that law or regulations.

“Motor vehicle” means an automobile, motorcycle, truck, trailer, semitrailer, truck tractor and semitrailer combination, farm equipment or any other vehicle operated on the roads of this state, used to transport persons or property, and propelled by power other than muscular power, but does not include traction engines, road rollers, earth movers, graders, loaders and other similar construction equipment requiring oversized tires, any vehicles which run only upon a track, bicycles or mopeds. For purposes of this article, “farm equipment” means any vehicle which uses tires having the following designations: I-1, I-2, I-3, R-1, R-2, R-3, F-1, F-2 and Farm Highway Service.

“Small business” means any commercial establishment not regulated under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-580, 42 U.S.C.S. 6901 et seq.), as amended or regulations promulgated thereto.

“Small quantity waste tire generator” means any private individual generating twenty-five (25) or fewer waste tires annually, or a tire retail outlet, automotive mechanic shop or other commercial or governmental entity that generates ten (10) or fewer waste tires per week.

“Tire” means a continuous solid or pneumatic rubber covering encircling the wheel of a motor vehicle.

“Waste tire” means a whole tire that is no longer suitable for its original intended purpose because of wear, damage or defect.

“Waste tire hauler” means any person engaged in the collection and/or transportation of fifty (50) or more waste tires for the purpose of storage, processing or disposal or any person transporting waste tires for compensation.

“Waste tire processing facility” means a site where tires are reduced in volume by shredding, cutting, chipping or otherwise altered to facilitate recycling, resource recovery or disposal. The term includes mobile waste tire processing equipment. Commercial enterprises processing waste tires shall not be considered solid waste management facilities.

“Waste tire collection site” means a site used for the storage of one hundred (100) or more waste tires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 17-17-405.
Provision to department of information regarding waste tire collection sites; maintenance of unauthorized waste tire collection or disposal sites; disposal of waste tires at unauthorized sites; closure of sites upon cessation of operations.

Owners and operators of any waste tire collection site shall provide the department with information concerning the site’s location, size and approximate number of waste tires that have been accumulated at the site. The department shall promptly provide that information to the chancery clerk of the county in which the site is located.

It is unlawful for any person to maintain a waste tire collection site or a waste tire disposal site unless the site is authorized by the department or permitted by the permit board. It is unlawful for any person to dispose of waste tires in the state unless the waste tires are disposed at an authorized waste tire collection site, a waste tire collection center, waste tire processing site or a waste tire disposal site.

Each operator of a waste tire collection site in operation or accepting waste tires after January 1, 1991, shall ensure that the area is properly closed upon cessation of operations. The department may require that a closure plan be submitted with the application for authorization. The closure plan, as approved by the department, shall include at least the following:

A description of how and when the area will be closed; and

The method of final disposition of any waste tires remaining on the site at the time notice of closure is given to the department.

The operator shall notify the department at least ninety (90) days before the date the operator expects closure to begin. No waste tires may be received by the waste tire collection site after the date closure is to begin.

If the operator of a waste tire collection site fails to properly implement the closure plan, the commission shall order the operator to implement that plan, and take other steps under Section 17-17-29 to assure the proper closure of the site.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 17-17-407.
Promulgation and enforcement of rules and regulations.

The commission may promulgate and enforce rules and regulations pertaining to collection, transportation, storage, processing and disposal of waste tires and may modify, repeal, make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from the rules and regulations. The rules and regulations shall include:

Methods of collection, storage, processing and disposal of waste tires. The following are permissible methods of waste tire processing and disposal:

Controlling soil erosion, when whole tires are not used;

Grinding into crumbs for use in road asphalt, tire derived fuel and as raw materials for other products;

Pyrolizing or other physico-chemical processing;

Incineration;

Landfilling split, ground, chopped, sliced or shredded waste tires until July 1, 2000. Beginning July 1, 2000, the landfilling of waste tires in any form, including, but not limited to, split, ground, chopped, sliced, shredded or whole waste tires is prohibited, unless the commission grants an exception. In determining whether to grant an exception, the commission shall consider the following factors: A. Whether sufficient end-use or recycling markets have developed in all or parts of the state, B. whether the condition of the waste tire or waste tire derived material prevents recycling, C. whether the prohibition on landfilling waste tires will place a financial burden on local governments, or D. other factors the commission deems relevant. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission shall, to the extent practicable, grant exceptions in areas of the state where the prohibition against landfilling waste tires will pose a demonstrated, unfunded financial burden on local governments.

Other methods as approved by the commission.

Procedures for authorization or permitting for waste tire collection sites, waste tire processing facilities, waste tire haulers and waste tire disposal sites, including a review of the applicant’s performance history;

Requirements for location of facilities at which waste tires are collected, stored, processed or disposed, with regards to property boundaries and buildings, pest control, accessibility by fire fighting equipment and other considerations as they relate to protection of public health and safety and the environment; and

Requirements for any financial assurance for waste tire haulers, waste tire collection sites, waste tire processing facilities and waste tire disposal facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 500, § 2; reenacted and amended, 1995, ch. 615, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 402, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 1999.).

§ 17-17-409.
Powers and duties of counties, regional solid waste management authorities or municipalities regarding waste tire collection, processing and disposal.

Each county, regional solid waste management authority or municipality, as the case may be, shall, as part of its local nonhazardous solid waste management plan as required by law, plan and provide an adequate number of waste tire collection sites within its jurisdiction, for the deposit of waste tires from small quantity waste tire generators and shall ensure the delivery of these tires on an adequate frequency to an authorized waste tire processing/disposal facility operated by the county, regional solid waste authority or private entity. Counties may establish, own and/or operate a waste tire collection site or sites or may enter into leases or other contractual arrangements with other counties or private entities for the operation of waste tire collection sites for small quantity generators. Nothing in this section shall prevent a county or regional solid waste authority from providing a more expansive waste tire management service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 500, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1993).

§ 17-17-411.
Registration of waste tire haulers; issuance and use of hauler identification numbers.

Any waste tire hauler transporting waste tires within or into the state must register with the department. Following submission of a completed application, the department shall issue to the waste tire hauler a waste tire hauling identification number.

Each waste tire hauler shall furnish its waste tire hauler identification number on all certification forms required under Sections 17-17-401 through 17-17-427 or regulations promulgated under those sections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 17-17-413.
Execution and disposition of certification form relating to waste tires collected and shipped for storage, processing or disposal.

Every tire retailer or other person providing waste tires for transportation to a facility for storage, processing or disposal shall complete and sign a certification form, as prescribed by the department certifying the number of waste tires shipped for processing or disposal, the county and state in which the tires were collected and the name and address of the waste tire processing, storage and/or disposal facility for which the waste tires are destined. The form shall be completed and signed by the waste tire hauler, certifying receipt of such waste tires from the tire retailer or other person providing waste tires for transportation to a facility for storage, processing or disposal. The waste tire hauler shall present the certification form to the owner or operator of a waste tire collection facility, waste tire processing facility or a waste tire disposal facility at the time of delivery of waste tires for collection, processing or disposal. The tire retailer or other person providing the waste tires for transportation shall retain a copy of the certification signed by such person and the waste tire hauler. The waste tire hauler and the owner or operator of the facility receiving the waste tires shall each retain a copy of the certification containing all signatures. Copies of these certification forms shall be retained for a minimum of three (3) years after the date of delivery of the waste tires.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to tires that are provided for disposal in quantities of five (5) or less by a person other than a waste tire collector, waste tire processor or waste tire hauler.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-415.
Tire retailers required to accept used or waste tires from customer at time of purchase; fee for accepting used or waste tire for disposal; limits and restrictions on holding of waste tires by retailers or wholesalers, motor vehicle dismantlers and salvage dealers.

Any person selling new or reusable tires at retail shall accept from a customer at the point of transfer, used or waste tires in a quantity at least equal to the number of new or reusable tires purchased, if offered by the customer. The retailer may assess a disposal fee on each tire sold. If the retailer imposes a disposal fee, the retailer is prohibited from imposing a disposal fee on the customer in excess of the actual per tire disposal costs incurred by the retailer and is also prohibited from waiving the disposal fee if the customer keeps the used or waste tire. In addition, if a retailer is required to remit the waste tire fee in Section 17-17-423 directly to the State Tax Commission, the fee shall be considered a part of his actual disposal costs.

Any tire retailer, tire wholesaler, motor vehicle dismantler and salvage dealer may hold not more than five hundred (500) waste tires for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days without being authorized as a waste tire collection site, if such tires are stored in a manner which protects human health and the environment pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 500, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 536, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 17-17-417.
Use of waste tires for soil erosion abatement, drainage and agricultural purposes.

A person who leases or owns real property may use waste tires for soil erosion abatement and drainage purposes in accordance with procedures approved by the commission, or to secure covers over silage, hay, straw or agricultural products.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-419.
Abatement of unauthorized waste tire dump or stockpile.

If the commission is notified of and upon investigation confirms the presence of an unauthorized waste tire dump or stockpile it shall notify the person responsible for the unauthorized waste tire dump and request that the waste tires be processed or removed. If the person fails to take the requested action, the commission shall order the person to abate the unauthorized waste tire dump. If the person responsible for the unauthorized waste tire dump is not the owner of the property on which the unauthorized waste tire dump is located, the commission may order the property owner to permit abatement of the unauthorized waste tire dump. If the person responsible for the unauthorized waste tire dump fails to comply with the order, the commission shall take any action necessary to abate the unauthorized waste tire dump, including entering the property where the unauthorized waste tire dump is located and confiscating the waste tires or arranging to have the waste tires processed or removed.

When the commission abates any unauthorized waste tire dump pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the person responsible for the unauthorized waste tire dump shall be liable for the actual costs incurred by the commission including all administrative and legal expenses related to the abatement of the unauthorized waste tire dump. The commission may initiate a civil action to recover these costs from any persons responsible for the unauthorized waste tire dump. Nonpayment of the actual costs incurred by the commission may result in the imposition of a lien on the owner’s real property on which the unauthorized waste tire dump is located if the owner has been identified by the commission as a responsible party.

The commission may elect to suspend any or all of the actions against the person responsible contingent upon such factors as the date of formation of the unauthorized waste tire dump, the size of the tire dump, and any other factors which may warrant suspension of actions. The commission may in such cases enter into an agreed consent order with the person responsible whereby the commission agrees to arrange for a contractor to process or remove the waste tires.

When the commission cannot determine a responsible person, the commission may enter into an agreed consent order with the landowner whereby the commission agrees to arrange for a contractor to process or remove the waste tires. If the landowner refuses to enter into an agreed consent order, the commission may hold the landowner responsible for continuing the existence of the unauthorized dump and the commission may exercise the authority granted in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

It is the intent of the Legislature that in its enforcement of this section the commission shall consider the availability of facilities for the processing or disposal of waste tires within the geographic area of any unauthorized waste tire dump prior to the issuance of any order imposing a fine against the owner or person responsible for an unauthorized waste tire dump.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 10; Laws, 1993, ch. 500, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1993).

§ 17-17-421.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1995, ch. 615, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

[Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 11; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 9; Laws, 1993, ch. 500, § 6]

§ 17-17-423.
Imposition, administration, collection, enforcement and disposition of waste tire fee.

There is imposed a waste tire fee upon the sale of each new tire sold at wholesale. The fee shall be imposed on any person engaging in the business of making wholesale sales of new tires within this state. The fee shall be imposed at the rate of One Dollar ($1.00) for each new tire sold with a rim diameter of less than twenty-four (24) inches and Two Dollars ($2.00) for each new tire sold with a rim diameter of twenty-four (24) inches or greater. The fee shall be added to the total cost to the purchaser at wholesale; however, a person engaged in the business of making retail sales of tires in this state who purchases tires from a wholesaler or manufacturer outside this state upon which the waste tire fee is not imposed, shall be responsible for remitting the waste tire fee directly to the State Tax Commission in lieu of payment of the tax to the wholesaler or manufacturer. The fee imposed, less five percent (5%) of fees collected, which shall be retained by the tire wholesaler or retailer as collection costs, shall be paid to the State Tax Commission in the form and manner required by the State Tax Commission and shall include a statement showing the total number of new tires sold during the preceding month. The State Tax Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the fee collection and enforcement.

The State Tax Commission shall administer, collect and enforce the fee authorized under this section under the same procedures used in the administration, collection and enforcement of the state sales tax imposed under Chapter 65, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, except as provided in this section. The proceeds of the waste tire fee, less five percent (5%) of the proceeds, which shall be retained by the State Tax Commission as collection costs, shall be transferred by the State Tax Commission into the waste tire account of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 12; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 536, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 17-17-425.
Utilization of monies allocated to environmental protection trust fund from waste tire fees.

Beginning July 1, 1995, monies allocated to the Environmental Protection Trust Fund from waste tire fees shall be accounted for in a waste tire account and shall be utilized for the following purposes:

Not more than sixty percent (60%) shall be utilized for making grants to counties, municipalities or regional solid waste management authorities: (i) for providing a waste tire collection program for small quantity waste tire generators as provided in Section 17-17-409; (ii) for use in clean-up of small scattered unauthorized waste tire dumps not abated under Section 17-17-419; (iii) for matching funds for employment of a solid waste enforcement officer as provided in Section 17-17-65; and (iv) for purchase of products derived from Mississippi waste tires;

Not more than five percent (5%) shall be utilized by the department for abatement of unauthorized waste tire dumps as provided in Section 17-17-419;

Not more than fifteen percent (15%) shall be utilized (i) to provide incentive grants to persons that will manufacture products from waste tires, use recovered rubber from waste tires or use waste tires as a fuel or fuel supplement, (ii) to provide funding for research and demonstration projects directly related to solving solid waste problems resulting from waste tires, including the use of innovative technologies for the processing of waste tires, (iii) to provide an incentive reimbursement to end users for the costs of using waste tires or waste tire derived materials where those tires originate in the State of Mississippi, if the commission determines an incentive is necessary to promote market development. The commission may determine legitimate end uses that may be eligible for reimbursement and an acceptable rate of reimbursement; and

Not more than twenty percent (20%) shall be utilized by the department to pay the costs of administering these funds and the waste tire management program required under Sections 17-17-405, 17-17-407, 17-17-411, 17-17-413, 17-17-419 and 17-17-423.

To provide for the maximum effective use of funds in the waste tire account, the commission, upon determination that unused funds are available in a particular program as described above, may reallocate funds between the programs described in paragraphs (a) through (c) of subsection (1) to exceed the percentage thresholds.

The commission may consolidate any grant provided under this section with any grant provided under the local governments solid waste assistance program or the Right-Way-To-Throw-Away Program. Funds provided through any consolidated grant shall be used in accordance with the program under which the funds are provided.

The commission shall establish a statewide plan for the use of monies received under Sections 17-17-401 through 17-17-427 and shall adopt regulations for administering this fund. The regulations shall include eligibility requirements for persons requesting incentive grants and funding for research and demonstration projects. No incentive grant or research and demonstration project funding may be awarded for an activity which receives less than seventy-five percent (75%) of its waste tires from Mississippi waste tires sites, retailers or residents. The commission may consider requests for funding from applicants who do not meet this requirement contingent upon the applicant demonstrating that the activity does or will accept Mississippi tires and that the award of the requested funding would be in the best interest of the State of Mississippi. The burden of proof shall be on the applicant to show that eligibility requirements have been met.

For the purpose of establishing a statewide plan for the use of monies received under Sections 17-17-401 through 17-17-427 and proposing regulations for administering this fund, including eligibility requirements and application priorities, the commission shall create an advisory council consisting of members of the tire industry, the general public, the department, and the Department of Economic and Community Development.

The department shall provide technical assistance, upon written request, to a municipality, county or group of counties desiring assistance in applying for waste tire grants or choosing a method of waste tire management which would be an eligible use of the grant funds.

Subject to the authority of the commission in subsection (2) of this section, monies existing in the waste tire account of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund on July 1, 1995, shall remain in the account as previously allocated but those monies which have been allocated for incentive grants or research and demonstration awards shall be combined as described in subsection (1)(c) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 13; Laws, 1993, ch. 500, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 615, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 571, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 17-17-427.
Hauling or disposal of waste tires in violation of §§ 17-17-401 through 17-17-427.

Any person who hauls or disposes of a waste tire in violation of Sections 17-17-401 through 17-17-427 or any rules and regulations promulgated under those sections may be assessed a civil penalty of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per violation. Each tire hauled or disposed of in violation of Sections 17-17-401 through 17-17-427 or any rules or regulations promulgated under those sections constitutes a separate violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 521, § 14; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 17-17-429.
Disposal of lead acid batteries.

No person may place a lead acid battery in mixed municipal solid waste, discard or otherwise dispose of a lead acid battery except by delivery to a battery retailer or wholesaler, or to a permitted secondary lead smelter, or to a collection or recycling facility authorized under the laws of this state.

No battery retailer shall dispose of a lead acid battery except by delivery to the agent of a battery wholesaler or a permitted secondary lead smelter, to a battery manufacturer for delivery to a permitted secondary lead smelter or to a collection or recycling facility authorized under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-431.
Duties of retail sellers of lead acid batteries.

A person selling lead acid batteries at retail or offering lead acid batteries for retail sale in the state shall:

Accept from customers, at the point of transfer, used lead acid batteries in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, if offered by customers; and

Post written notice which must be at least eight and one-half inches (8-1/2") by eleven inches (11") in size and must contain the universal recycling symbol and the following language:

“IT IS ILLEGAL TO DISCARD A MOTOR VEHICLE BATTERY OR OTHER LEAD ACID BATTERY”;

“RECYCLE YOUR USED BATTERIES”; and

“STATE LAW REQUIRES U.S. TO ACCEPT USED MOTOR VEHICLE BATTERIES OR OTHER LEAD ACID BATTERIES FOR RECYCLING IN EXCHANGE FOR NEW BATTERIES PURCHASED.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-433.
Preparation and distribution of notices required by § 17-17-431; inspection of premises and issuance of warnings; penalty for failure to post notice after receipt of warning.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall produce, print and distribute the notices required by Section 17-17-431 to all places where lead acid batteries are offered for sale at retail. In performing its duties under this section, the department may inspect any place, building or premise governed by Section 17-17-431. Authorized employees of the department may issue warnings to a person who fails to comply with the requirement of those sections. Any person who fails to post the required notice after receiving a warning may be subject to a fine of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per day.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-435.
Duty of wholesale sellers of lead acid batteries; removal of batteries accepted in transfer from battery retailers.

Any person selling new lead acid batteries at wholesale shall accept from customers at the point of transfer, used lead acid batteries in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, if offered by customers. A person accepting batteries in transfer from a battery retailer shall be allowed a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days to remove batteries from the retail point of collection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-437.
Promulgation, etc., of rules and regulations for implementation of §§ 17-17-429 through 17-17-445; penalties for violations.

The commission may adopt, modify, repeal, promulgate, make exceptions to, grant exemptions and variances from and enforce rules and regulations required to implement Sections 17-17-429 through 17-17-445. Unless a different penalty is specifically prescribed, any person found guilty by the commission of violating Sections 17-17-401 through 17-17-445, any rule or regulation or written order promulgated or issued by the commission shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in Section 17-17-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 19; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 17-17-439.
Creation of “Right-Way-To-Throw-Away Program.”

To ensure the proper collection and management of hazardous wastes from households, farms, schools and small businesses, there is hereby created a program to be known as the “Right-Way-To-Throw-Away Program.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-441.
Development and administration of program; promulgation of rules and regulations for administration of funds for grants for establishment of household hazardous waste collection and management programs.

The department shall develop and administer the Right-Way-To-Throw-Away Program.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of funds, as may be appropriated or otherwise made available, for grants to counties, municipalities and multicounty agencies for the establishment and operation of household hazardous waste collection and management programs. The commission shall give priority to those programs operated by multicounty agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-443.
Registration and approval of programs for collection and management of household hazardous wastes; maintenance and submission of records.

No person shall establish a program for the collection and management of household hazardous wastes until such program has been registered with and approved by the department. Each person shall also maintain and submit records to the department as required under the guidelines developed under Section 17-17-445.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-17-445.
Powers and duties regarding administration of program.

The department shall have the following powers and duties in the administration of the Right-Way-To-Throw-Away Program established under Sections 17-17-439 through 17-17-445:

To determine the types of household hazardous wastes to be handled in the program;

To approve any collection contractor or contractors used in the implementation of a local household hazardous waste collection and management program;

To prepare a request for proposals, select a collection contractor and facilitate the use of that contractor on a statewide basis to conduct all local household hazardous waste collection and management programs;

To establish guidelines for the registration and operations of household hazardous waste collection and management programs;

To inspect any collection site operated under Sections 17-17-439 through 17-17-445 to insure that collection is performed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;

To develop record keeping requirements identifying types and amounts of household hazardous wastes collected, entities submitting household hazardous waste and the points of ultimate disposition;

To submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature summarizing the operation and costs of the program, including location of sites, types and amounts of waste collected, entities disposing of waste at the collection sites and the methods utilized for disposal of the wastes; and

To exercise any other powers and duties as the department may require to administer the Right-Way-To-Throw-Away Program.

The commission may consolidate any grant provided under this section with any grant provided under the local governments solid waste assistance program or the waste tire management program. Funds provided through any consolidated grant shall be used in accordance with the program under which the funds are provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 531, § 23; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 10; Laws, 1997, ch. 544, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.